North Carolina, session 2025, HB1096.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. AVIATION INVESTMENT GRANT
*H1096-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Commerce the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027
fiscal year to be allocated to the One North Carolina Aviation Capital Project Account under
G.S. 143B-437.71(d), as created by subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 143B-437.71 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(d) One North Carolina Aviation Capital Project Account. – There is created in the One
North Carolina Fund a special account, the One North Carolina Aviation Capital Project Account,
to be used for the One North Carolina Aviation Capital Project Program, as specified in Part 2K
of Article 10 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes."
SECTION 1.(c) Article 10 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 2K. One North Carolina Aviation Capital Project Program.
"§ 143B-437.125. One North Carolina Aviation Capital Project Program.
(a) Program. – There is established the One North Carolina Aviation Capital Project
Program to be administered by the Department in consultation with the North Carolina
Department of Transportation, Division of Aviation. In order to modernize the State's airport
infrastructure and improve capacity for aerospace manufacturing, maintenance, repair, overhaul,
and advanced aerospace research and design, the Department may provide grants to airports to
offset costs incurred for airport projects in accordance with this section. Grants under this section
shall be paid from the One North Carolina Aviation Capital Project Account established in
G.S. 143B-437.71.
(b) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Airport. – As defined in G.S. 63-1.
(2) Airport facility. – As defined in G.S. 143-215.57A.
(3) Airport project. – As defined in G.S. 143-215.57A.
(4) Department. – The Department of Commerce.
(5) Eligible aerospace business. – A business that (i) designs, manufactures,
repairs, or operates aircraft and (ii) has entered into a company performance
agreement approved by the Department in accordance with this section.
(6) Program. – The One North Carolina Aviation Capital Project Program created
by this section.
(c) Eligible Recipient; Allowable Uses. – Airports may receive funding under the
Program. Funding may be disbursed to airport authorities only for airport projects.
(d) Agreements Required. – Prior to the disbursement of funds under this section, the
airport shall (i) enter into a grant agreement with the State, in substantially the same manner
provided by, and except to the extent inconsistent with, G.S. 143B-437.72(c), regarding local
government grant agreements, and (ii) enter into a company performance agreement with an
eligible aerospace business, in substantially the same manner provided by, and except to the
extent inconsistent with, G.S. 143B-437.72(b), regarding company performance agreements.
Funds may only be disbursed under the Program to the airport after the airport has demonstrated
that the eligible aerospace business has complied with the terms of the company performance
agreement. The State shall disburse funds under the Program in accordance with the disbursement
schedule established in the grant agreement with the State.
(e) Program Guidelines. – The Department shall develop guidelines related to the
administration of the Program which shall include, at a minimum, a provision or provisions
requiring that grants under the Program shall be awarded on a competitive basis based upon, at a
minimum, the projected economic impact of the airport project. At least 20 days before the
effective date of any guidelines or nontechnical amendments to guidelines, the Department must
publish the proposed guidelines on the Department's website and provide notice to persons who
have requested notice of proposed guidelines. In addition, the Department must accept oral and
written comments on the proposed guidelines during the 15 business days beginning on the first
Page 2 House Bill 1096-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
day that the Department has completed these notifications. For the purpose of this section, a
technical amendment is either of the following:
(1) An amendment that corrects a spelling or grammatical error.
(2) An amendment that makes a clarification based on public comment and could
have been anticipated by the public notice that immediately preceded the
public comment."

PART II. AEROSPACE WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM

COMMUNITY COLLEGE AEROSPACE PROGRAM
SECTION 2.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Community
Colleges System Office the sum of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to community colleges to be used to create or
expand training programs for careers in the aerospace workforce. The System Office may use up
to five percent (5%) of funds appropriated in this section for administrative costs associated with
creating or expanding training programs pursuant to this section, including marketing campaigns
to spread awareness of programs created or expanded pursuant to this section.

AEROSPACE APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM
SECTION 2.2.(a) Program Established. – There is established the Aerospace
Apprenticeship Program (Program). The purpose of the Program is to provide grants to
employers in the aerospace sector to incentivize the formation of partnerships with local
community colleges for apprenticeship opportunities.
SECTION 2.2.(b) Application; Selection of Partners. – The Community Colleges
System Office shall make an application publicly available by August 1, 2026, to be completed
by employers seeking to participate in the Program. Applications shall be submitted by
September 1, 2026. Incentive grants shall be awarded to employers to the extent funds are
available for that purpose. The System Office shall prioritize applications that include a higher
percentage of employer matching funds, apprenticeship programs that culminate in a credential
or job offer, and programs that lead to stackable credentials that build off existing programs in
the State and align with existing career pathways and nationally recognized aviation standards.
Applications for participation in the Program shall include at least the following:
(1) Employers provide at least fifty percent (50%) of the value of the grant award
as matching funds to support the apprenticeship.
(2) Structured apprenticeships lasting at least six months in duration.
(3) Apprenticeships aligning with high-demand aerospace fields, including
airframe and powerplant mechanics, avionics technicians, composites, and
precision machining.
(4) Commitment to offer interviews or hiring preference to graduates who
successfully complete the apprenticeship.
SECTION 2.2.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Community
Colleges System Office the sum of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to provide grants pursuant to this section. The System
Office may use up to five percent (5%) of funds appropriated in this section for administrative
costs associated with administering the Program, including marketing campaigns to spread
awareness of the Program.

AEROSPACE DUAL-ENROLLMENT PROGRAMS
SECTION 2.3.(a) The Community Colleges System Office shall use up to five
million dollars ($5,000,000) of the funds appropriated in this section to develop a dual enrollment
pilot program to enable high school students to begin coursework toward completion of a
House Bill 1096-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
certification in the aerospace sector. The System Office may use up to five percent (5%) of funds
allocated pursuant to this subsection for administrative costs, including marketing campaigns to
spread awareness of the pilot program created pursuant to this section.
SECTION 2.3.(b) The Community Colleges System Office shall use up to five
million dollars ($5,000,000) of the funds appropriated in this section to provide grants to
community colleges that partner with high schools to offer career and technical education
pathways aligned with aerospace training to cover the cost of expenses associated with
establishing those programs. The System Office may use up to five percent (5%) of funds
allocated pursuant to this subsection for administrative costs, including marketing campaigns to
spread awareness of pathways offered pursuant to this section.
SECTION 2.3.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Community
Colleges System Office the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the purposes established pursuant to this section.

PART III. AEROSPACE HUB PROGRAM
SECTION 3.1. There is appropriated from the Economic Development Project
Reserve established in Section 2.2 of S.L. 2021-180 to the Department of Transportation,
Aviation Division, for the 2026-2027 fiscal year the sum of one hundred million dollars
($100,000,000) in nonrecurring funds to support airport infrastructure modernization geared
toward incentivizing aerospace manufacturing projects. Up to five percent (5%) of the funds
appropriated by this section may be used for administrative and marketing expenses consistent
with the purposes for which the funds were appropriated.
SECTION 3.2. The Department of Commerce shall develop a program to certify
sites in the State as aerospace innovation zones using, at a minimum, infrastructure and embedded
university partnerships as criteria for certification. For purposes of this section, "aerospace
innovation zone" refers to geographically concentrated areas designed to foster collaboration and
innovation within the aerospace industry.

PART IV. AEROSPACE RESEARCH GRANTS
SECTION 4. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina the sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide grants to postsecondary constituent
institutions of The University of North Carolina to research aerospace flight. In awarding these
grants, the Board shall prioritize the award of funds to constituent institutions that (i) conduct
research in partnership with third-party industry leaders in the field of aerospace flight or (ii)
secure matching funds for aerospace research from one or more non-State sources. Up to five
percent (5%) of the funds appropriated by this section may be used for administrative and
marketing expenses consistent with the purposes for which the funds were appropriated.

PART V. SUPPLY CHAIN SUPPORT
SECTION 5. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the nonprofit
corporation with which the Department of Commerce contracts pursuant to G.S. 143B-431.01
the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027
fiscal year to establish a program for helping North Carolina-based aerospace companies with
export assistance and Federal Aviation Administration certification.

PART VI. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 4 House Bill 1096-First Edition